Utah statutes.
62A-5-317.   Authority to transfer resident.

(1)  The administrator of an intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability, or the administrator's designee, may transfer or authorize the transfer of a resident to another intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability if, before the transfer, the administrator conducts a careful evaluation of the resident and the resident's treatment needs, and determines that a transfer would be in the best interest of that resident.  If a resident is transferred, the administrator shall give immediate notice of the transfer to the resident's spouse, guardian, parent, or advocate or, if none of those persons are known, to the resident's nearest known relative.

(2)  If a resident, or the resident's parent or guardian, objects to a proposed transfer under this section, the administrator shall conduct a hearing on the objection before a committee composed of persons selected by the administrator.  That committee shall hear all evidence and make a recommendation to the administrator concerning the proposed transfer.  The transfer may not take effect until the committee holds that hearing and the administrator renders a final decision on the proposed transfer.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

